Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
EXECUTION

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69; DCRCP rules 64, 69.

§651-31 Time of issuance. Execution
and alias executions upon any judgment or decree of a court for the payment of
money, may be issued at any time during the life of the judgment or decree. [CC
1859, §1031; am L 1919, c 42, §1; RL 1925, §2436; am L 1929, c 81, §1; RL 1935,
§4135; RL 1945, §10162; RL 1955, §233-30; HRS §651-31; am L 1970, c 188, §39]

Revision Note

The words "of record or a judge thereof, or any judgment
of a district magistrate" following "court" have been deleted to
give effect to L 1970, c 188.

Case Notes

Execution on subsisting and valid foreign judgment. 128 F.
Supp. 697, 706 (1955).

Issuance of second writ of execution. 18 H. 307 (1907).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next